North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article I Declaration of Rights
§ 30. Militia and the right to bear arms.

A well regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free State, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed; and, as standing armies in time of peace are dangerous to liberty, they shall not be maintained, and the military shall be kept under strict subordination to, and governed by, the civil power. Nothing herein shall justify the practice of carrying concealed weapons, or prevent the General Assembly from enacting penal statutes against that practice.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 24, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “A Fighting Chance for Outlaws: Strict Scrutiny of North Carolina’s Felony Firearms Act,” see 32 Campbell L. Rev. 333 (2010).

For article, “Do the Mentally Ill Have a Right to Bear Arms?,” see 48 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (2013).

For note, “The Fourth is Strong in This One: A Comparative Analysis of the Fourth Circuit’s Approach to Judicial Scrutiny in Second Amendment Cases,” see 9 Elon L. Rev. 225 (2017).

For article, “Style, Substance, and the Right to Keep and Bear Assault Weapons,” see 40 Campbell L. Rev. 301 (2018).

For article, “Heller and Public Carry Restrictions,” see 40 Campbell L. Rev. 431 (2018).

For article, “Comment on Ruben and Blocher:
Too Damn Many Cases, and an Absent Supreme Court,” 68 Duke L.J. Online 17 (2018).

For article, “A Close Reading of an Excellent Distant Reading of Heller in the Courts,” see 68 Duke L.J. Online 41 (2018).

For article, “Is the Second Amendment A Second-Class Right?,” see 68 Duke L.J.
Online 58 (2018).

For note, “Leave Your Guns at Home: The Constitutionality of a Prohibition on Carrying Firearms at Political Demonstrations,” see 68 Duke L.J. 176 (2018).

For article, “From Theory to Doctrine:
An Empirical Analysis of the Right to Keep and Bear Arms After Heller,” see 67 Duke L.J. 1433 (2018).

§ 31. Quartering of soldiers.

No soldier shall in time of peace be quartered in any house without the consent of the owner, nor in time of war but in a manner prescribed by law.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 36, Const. 1868.

§ 32. Exclusive emoluments.

No person or set of persons is entitled to exclusive or separate emoluments or privileges from the community but in consideration of public services.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 7, Const. 1868, as amended in 1946.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the six year statutory bar to products liability actions, in light of Tetterton v. Long Manufacturing Co.,

314 N.C. 44

, 332 S.E.2d 67 (1985), see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1157 (1986).

For note, “Municipal Ownership of Cable Television Systems: Madison Cablevision, Inc. v. City of Morganton,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 1295 (1990).

For article, “What Exactly Is a ‘Substantial Constitutional Question’ for Purposes of Appeal to the North Carolina Supreme Court?,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 211 (2011).

For article, “Economic Development Incentives and North Carolina Local Governments:
A Framework for Analysis,” see 91 N.C. L. Rev. 2021 (2013).

§ 33. Hereditary emoluments and honors.

No hereditary emoluments, privileges, or honors shall be granted or conferred in this State.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 30, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 34. Perpetuities and monopolies.

Perpetuities and monopolies are contrary to the genius of a free state and shall not be allowed.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

For prohibition against exclusive emoluments other than in consideration of public services, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 32.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 31, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A Proposal for a Simple and Socially Effective Rule Against Perpetuities,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 545 (1988).

For article, “Does the Fee Tail Exist in North Carolina?,” see 23 Wake Forest L. Rev. 767 (1988).

For article, “Allowing Perpetuities in North Carolina,” see 31 Campbell L. Rev. 399 (2009).

§ 35. Recurrence to fundamental principles.

A frequent recurrence to fundamental principles is absolutely necessary to preserve the blessings of liberty.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 29, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For an essay, “On the Significance of Constitutional Spirit,” see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1803 (1992).

For article, “The Rising Tide of North Carolina Constitutional Protection in the New Millenium,” see 27 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (2005).

§ 36. Other rights of the people.

The enumeration of rights in this Article shall not be construed to impair or deny others retained by the people.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 38, Const. 1868, as amended in 1962.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Rising Tide of North Carolina Constitutional Protection in the New Millenium,” see 27 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (2005).

§ 37. Rights of victims of crime.

Basic rights.— Victims of crime or acts of delinquency shall be treated with dignity and respect by the criminal justice system.

(1a)

Enumerated rights.—

When the crime or act of delinquency is one against or involving the person of the victim or is equivalent to a felony property crime, the victim is entitled to the following rights:

(1b)

Enforcement of rights.—

Except as otherwise provided herein, the General Assembly shall further provide, by general law, the procedure whereby a victim may assert the rights provided in this section. The victim or, if the victim is a minor, is legally incapacitated, or deceased, a family member, guardian, or legal custodian may assert the rights provided in this section. The procedure shall be by motion to the court of jurisdiction within the same criminal or juvenile proceeding giving rise to the rights. The victim, family member, guardian, or legal custodian have the right to counsel at this hearing but do not have the right to counsel provided by the State. If the matter involves an allegation that the district attorney failed to comply with the rights of a victim when obligated to so do by law, the victim must first afford the district attorney with jurisdiction over the criminal action an opportunity to resolve any issue in a timely manner.

(2)

No money damages; other claims.—

Nothing in this section shall be construed as creating a claim for money damages, or any cause of action, against the State, a county, a municipality, or any of the agencies, instrumentalities, or officers and employees thereof.

(3)

No ground for relief in criminal case.—

The failure or inability of any person to provide a right or service provided under this section may not be used by a defendant in a criminal case, an inmate, or any other accused as a ground for relief in any trial, appeal, postconviction litigation, habeas corpus, civil action, or any similar criminal or civil proceeding. Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide grounds for a victim (i) to appeal any decision made in a criminal or juvenile proceeding; (ii) to challenge any verdict, sentence, or adjudication; (iii) to participate as a party in any proceeding; or (iv) to obtain confidential juvenile records.

(4)

No restriction of authority.—

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the power of the district attorney, or the inherent authority of the court.

(5)

Implementation.—

The General Assembly may prescribe general laws to further define and implement this section.

The right upon request to reasonable, accurate, and timely notice of court proceedings of the accused.

(a1)

The right upon request to be present at court proceedings of the accused.

The right to be reasonably heard at any court proceeding involving the plea, conviction, adjudication, sentencing, or release of the accused.

The right to receive restitution in a reasonably timely manner, when ordered by the court.

The right to be given information about the crime or act of delinquency, how the criminal justice system works, the rights of victims, and the availability of services for victims.

The right upon request to receive information about the conviction, adjudication, or final disposition and sentence of the accused.

The right upon request to receive notification of escape, release, proposed parole or pardon of the accused, or notice of a reprieve or commutation of the accused’s sentence.

The right to present the victim’s views and concerns to the Governor or agency considering any action that could result in the release of the accused, prior to such action becoming effective.

The right to reasonably confer with the prosecution.

History.

1995, c. 438, s. 1; 2018-110, s. 1.

§ 38. Right to hunt, fish, and harvest wildlife.

The right of the people to hunt, fish, and harvest wildlife is a valued part of the State’s heritage and shall be forever preserved for the public good. The people have a right, including the right to use traditional methods, to hunt, fish, and harvest wildlife, subject only to laws enacted by the General Assembly and rules adopted pursuant to authority granted by the General Assembly to (i) promote wildlife conservation and management and (ii) preserve the future of hunting and fishing. Public hunting and fishing shall be a preferred means of managing and controlling wildlife. Nothing herein shall be construed to modify any provision of law relating to trespass, property rights, or eminent domain.

History.

2018-96, s. 1.